src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc
LEXICON Prefixes
L7_ ;!2025-06-19 seven-steps before stem
!Prefixes_01 ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< Prefixes_01 ; !sbj = subjunctive
!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%< Prefixes_01 ; ! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too? _intention to_

!Lonsdale 2001:211-212
!ɬubələskʷaxʷyildutəxʷčəɬ
!ɬu<bə<ləs<kʷaxʷ>y>il>d>ut>əxʷ>čəɬ
!Fut+ANEW+PgrSttv+help+YI+il+Trx+Rfx+Inc+our
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<las%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ɬu%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Sbj+Hab+Stat
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Hab+Stat
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ʔəsq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb _partly cloudy_ ɬasq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb __partly cloudy in the future__
!ʔəsgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny__ ɬasgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny in the future__
!ʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny__ ɬasʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny in the future__
!ʔəsgəqəb __sunny__ ɬasgəqil __sunny in the future__
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬəs%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬas%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u=bə= Hab+Add (check ordering)
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ƛ̕u%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!bə%<ƛ̕u%< Add+Hab (check ordering)
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@bə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<tu%< Sbj+Rem
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@gʷə%<tu%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< Hab+Pfv
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< Hab+Rem+Prog
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!!ƛ̕u%<0%<lə%< Hab+Prog
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;



!2025-06-19!LEXICON Prefixes_01
!2025-06-19!Prefixes_01a ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%< Prefixes_01a ;
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON Prefixes_01a
!2025-06-19!Prefixes_01b ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%< Prefixes_01b ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< Prefixes_01b ;
!2025-06-19!!bələhuy: __again/also it is done__
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON Prefixes_01b
!2025-06-19!Prefixes_01c ;
!2025-06-19!!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;
!2025-06-19!!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
!2025-06-19! DVNouns_01 ;
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON Prefixes_01c
!2025-06-19!@U.NPrefix.ZERO@:@U.NPrefix.ZERO@{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1} NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ; 
!2025-06-19!!NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ; !should this have @U.NPrefix.ZERO@ 2025-06-16
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON DVNouns
!2025-06-19!!@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_01 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
!2025-06-19!!@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_01 ; !2022-12-25 moved to DVNouns_02-02
!2025-06-19! DVNouns_01 ; !
!2025-06-19! 
!2025-06-19!!ƛ̕u=s=ʔəs Hab+Nmz+Stat
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!!ɬu=d=s=ʔaʔ Irr+PxSg1+Nmlz+be.there
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON DVNouns_01
!2025-06-19!! followed by PX
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%< DVNouns_02-1 ; !remote past, any predicate
!2025-06-19!DVNouns_02-1 ;
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON DVNouns_02-1
!2025-06-19!!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;!CHECKME2022
!2025-06-19!!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
!2025-06-19!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     DVNouns_02-2   ;!CHECKME2022
!2025-06-19!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    DVNouns_02-2   ;
!2025-06-19!DVNouns_02-2 ;
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON DVNouns_02-2
!2025-06-19!@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
!2025-06-19!@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !
!2025-06-19!DVNouns_02-3 ;
!2025-06-19!
!2025-06-19!LEXICON DVNouns_02-3
!2025-06-19!!@U.TAM.NO@:@U.TAM.NO@ Verbs ; 
!2025-06-19!!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.ZERO@  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!2025-06-16
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!non-circumscribed, progressive
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me
!2025-06-19!@U.TAM-A.CONT@:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ləcu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;

!!Begin
LEXICON L7_
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< L6_ ; !sbj = subjunctive
@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@                        L6_ ;

!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@gʷə%< L5_ ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%< L5_ ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@gʷə%<ɬu%< L4_ ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@    L5_ ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%<    L5_ ;
!@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%<   L4_ ;

LEXICON L6_
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%< L5_ ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%< L4_ ;! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too? _intention to_
@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@  L5_ ;

LEXICON L5_
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%< L4_ ;
@U.TAM-T.ZERO@ L4_ ;

LEXICON L4_
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%< L3_ ;
@U.TAM-RE.ZERO@ L3_ ;

LEXICON L3_
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%< L2_ ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%< L2_ ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@:@U.PossPx.Pl1@ L2_ ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@:@U.PossPx.Pl2@ L2_ ;
@U.PossPx.ZERO@ L2_ ;
@U.PossPx.SP3@ L2_ ;
 
LEXICON L2_
@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< L1_ ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< L1_ ; 

@U.NMZ.ZERO@  L1_ ;
@U.TAM-A.CONT@:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ləcu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!non-circumscribed, progressive
@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.PROG@s%<ə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.PROG@dəxʷ%<ə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; 

!2025-06-25!
!@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.STAT@s%<əs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.STAT@dəxʷ%<əs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.STAT@s%<as%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.STAT@dəxʷ%<as%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; 
!@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.NMZ.V2N@@U.TAM-A.PFV@s%<u%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.NMZ.V2A@@U.TAM-A.PFV@dəxʷ%<u%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;

LEXICON L1_
@U.TAM-A.ZERO@:@U.TAM-A.ZERO@ VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me

!!END


LEXICON VERBS_OR_NOUNS
 REDUPL_FOR_VERBS ;


@U.NPrefix.ZERO@:@U.NPrefix.ZERO@ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.c@:@U.NPrefix.c@c^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.dexw@:@U.NPrefix.dexw@dəxʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.dxw@:@U.NPrefix.dxw@dxʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.dxws@:@U.NPrefix.dxws@dxʷs^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.je@:@U.NPrefix.je@ǰə^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.le@:@U.NPrefix.le@lə^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.s@:@U.NPrefix.s@s^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.sexw@:@U.NPrefix.sexw@səxʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.sxw@:@U.NPrefix.sxw@sxʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.tsi@:@U.NPrefix.tsi@tsi^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.xh@:@U.NPrefix.xh@x̌^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.xhw@:@U.NPrefix.xhw@x̌ʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;
@U.NPrefix.xw@:@U.NPrefix.xw@xʷ^√ REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS ;

LEXICON REDUPL_FOR_VERBS
@U.REDUPL.ZERO@  Verbs ;
@U.REDUPL.123123@:@U.REDUPL.123123@^Red123123  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.PL123123@:@U.REDUPL.PL123123@^RedPL123123 REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.12123@:@U.REDUPL.12123@^Red12123  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.12q123@:@U.REDUPL.12q123@^Red12q123  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.1213@:@U.REDUPL.1213@^Red1213  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.12q13@:@U.REDUPL.12q13@^Red12q13  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.1i123@:@U.REDUPL.1i123@^Red1i123  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.1i13@:@U.REDUPL.1i13@^Red1i13  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.1iq123@:@U.REDUPL.1iq123@^Red1iq123  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.1iq13@:@U.REDUPL.1iq13@^Red1iq13  REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01 ;

LEXICON REDUPL_FOR_VERBS_01
:{p6}{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}{pØ} Verbs ;

LEXICON REDUPL_FOR_NOMINALS
@U.REDUPL.ZERO@  NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP_01 ;
@U.REDUPL.123123@:@U.REDUPL.123123@^Red123123  NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.PL123123@:@U.REDUPL.PL123123@^RedPL123123 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.12323@:@U.REDUPL.12323@^Red12323 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.12q123@:@U.REDUPL.12q123@^Red12q123 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.12q13@:@U.REDUPL.12q13@^Red12q13 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.12123@:@U.REDUPL.12123@^Red12123 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.1213@:@U.REDUPL.1213@^Red1213 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.1iq123@:@U.REDUPL.1iq123@^Red1iq123 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.1iq13@:@U.REDUPL.1iq13@^Red1iq13 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.1i123@:@U.REDUPL.1i123@^Red1i123 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.1i13@:@U.REDUPL.1i13@^Red1i13 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.PL1i1i13@:@U.REDUPL.PL1i1i13@^RedPL1i1i13 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.2CV2CiCV@:@U.REDUPL.2CV2CiCV@^Red2CV2CiCV NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;
@U.REDUPL.130130@:@U.REDUPL.130130@^RedPL130130 NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP ;


LEXICON NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP
:{p6}{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}{pØ} NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP_01 ;

LEXICON NOUNS_PREFIX_PREP_01
 Nouns ;
 Adjectives ;
 Propernouns ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
